Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Penalties

41.990.
Penalties.

If the president or cashier of any state depository willfully violates any of the provisions of KRS

41.230

,

41.240

,

41.270

or

41.320

, he shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Any officer, agent or employee of any budget unit who willfully fails or refuses to comply with, or expends any money in violation of, any of the provisions of KRS

41.070

,

41.110

to

41.160

,

41.210

,

41.220

,

41.260

,

41.270

,

41.290

or

41.300

shall be subject to indictment in the Franklin Circuit Court, and upon conviction shall be fined not less than fifty (50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

History.

1992b-63, 4694; 2021 ch. 155, § 23, effective June 29, 2021.